hu_HU.aff
SFX I   ek   etekhez      ek
SFX I   ek   eteket       ek
SFX I   ek   eteken       ek
SFX I   ek   etekbõl      ek
SFX I   ek   etekben      ek
SFX I   ek   etekbe       ek
SFX I   ek   etek         ek
SFX I   ek   esül         ek
SFX I   ek   esért        ek
SFX I   ek   estül        ek
SFX I   ek   estõl        ek
SFX I   ek   essé         ek
SFX I   ek   essel        ek
SFX I   ek   esrõl        ek
SFX I   ek   esre         ek
SFX I   ek   esnél        ek
SFX I   ek   esnek        ek
SFX I   ek   esként       ek
SFX I   ek   esig         ek
SFX I   ek   eshez        ek
SFX I   ek   eset         ek
SFX I   ek   esen         ek
SFX I   ek   esekül       ek
SFX I   ek   esekért      ek
SFX I   ek   esektõl      ek
SFX I   ek   esekrõl      ek
SFX I   ek   esekre       ek
SFX I   ek   eseknél      ek
SFX I   ek   eseknek      ek
SFX I   ek   esekké       ek
SFX I   ek   esekkel      ek
SFX I   ek   esekig       ek
SFX I   ek   esekhez      ek
SFX I   ek   eseket       ek
SFX I   ek   esekbõl      ek
SFX I   ek   esekben      ek
SFX I   ek   esekbe       ek
SFX I   ek   esek         ek
SFX I   ek   esebbõl      ek
SFX I   ek   esebbért     ek
SFX I   ek   esebbé       ek
SFX I   ek   esebbtõl     ek
SFX I   ek   esebbrõl     ek
SFX I   ek   esebbre      ek
SFX I   ek   esebbnél     ek
SFX I   ek   esebbnek     ek
SFX I   ek   esebbként    ek
SFX I   ek   esebbig      ek
SFX I   ek   esebbhez     ek
SFX I   ek   esebbet      ek
SFX I   ek   esebben      ek
SFX I   ek   esebben      ek
SFX I   ek   esebbel      ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekül    ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekért   ek
SFX I   ek   esebbektõl   ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekrõl   ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekre    ek
SFX I   ek   esebbeknél   ek
SFX I   ek   esebbeknek   ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekig    ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekhez   ek
SFX I   ek   esebbeket    ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekbõl   ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekben   ek
SFX I   ek   esebbekbe    ek
SFX I   ek   esebbek      ek
SFX I   ek   esebbe       ek
SFX I   ek   esebb        ek
SFX I   ek   esbõl        ek
SFX I   ek   esben        ek
SFX I   ek   esbe         ek
SFX I   ek   es           ek
SFX I   ek   enként       ek
SFX I   ek   emül         ek
SFX I   ek   eméül        ek
SFX I   ek   eméért       ek
SFX I   ek   emévé        ek
SFX I   ek   emével       ek
SFX I   ek   emétõl       ek
SFX I   ek   emét         ek
SFX I   ek   emérõl       ek
SFX I   ek   emért        ek
SFX I   ek   emére        ek
SFX I   ek   eménél       ek
SFX I   ek   emének       ek
SFX I   ek   emén         ek
SFX I   ek   eméig        ek
SFX I   ek   eméhez       ek
SFX I   ek   emébõl       ek
SFX I   ek   emében       ek
SFX I   ek   emébe        ek
SFX I   ek   emé          ek
SFX I   ek   emtõl        ek
SFX I   ek   emrõl        ek
SFX I   ek   emre         ek
SFX I   ek   emnél        ek
SFX I   ek   emnek        ek
SFX I   ek   emmé         ek
SFX I   ek   emmel        ek
SFX I   ek   emként       ek
SFX I   ek   emkor        ek
SFX I   ek   emig         ek
SFX I   ek   emhez        ek
SFX I   ek   emet         ek
SFX I   ek   emen         ek
SFX I   ek   embõl        ek
SFX I   ek   emben        ek
SFX I   ek   embe         ek
SFX I   ek   em           ek
SFX I   ek   ekül         ek
SFX I   ek   ekéül        ek
SFX I   ek   ekéért       ek
SFX I   ek   ekévé        ek
SFX I   ek   ekével       ek
SFX I   ek   ekétõl       ek
SFX I   ek   ekét         ek
SFX I   ek   ekérõl       ek
SFX I   ek   ekért        ek
SFX I   ek   ekére        ek
SFX I   ek   ekénél       ek
SFX I   ek   eként        ek
SFX I   ek   ekének       ek
SFX I   ek   ekén         ek
SFX I   ek   ekéig        ek
SFX I   ek   ekéhez       ek
SFX I   ek   ekébõl       ek
SFX I   ek   ekében       ek
SFX I   ek   ekébe        ek
SFX I   ek   eké          ek
SFX I   ek   ektõl        ek
SFX I   ek   ekrõl        ek
SFX I   ek   ekre         ek
SFX I   ek   ekor         ek
SFX I   ek   eknél        ek
SFX I   ek   eknek        ek
SFX I   ek   ekként       ek
SFX I   ek   ekké         ek
SFX I   ek   ekkor        ek
SFX I   ek   ekkel        ek
SFX I   ek   ekig         ek
SFX I   ek   ekhez        ek
SFX I   ek   eket         ek
SFX I   ek   eken         ek
SFX I   ek   ekbõl        ek
SFX I   ek   ekben        ek
SFX I   ek   ekbe         ek
SFX I   ek   eiül         ek
SFX I   ek   eiéül        ek
SFX I   ek   eiéért       ek
SFX I   ek   eiévé        ek
SFX I   ek   eiével       ek
SFX I   ek   eiétõl       ek
SFX I   ek   eiét         ek
SFX I   ek   eiérõl       ek
SFX I   ek   eiért        ek
SFX I   ek   eiére        ek
SFX I   ek   eiénél       ek
SFX I   ek   eiének       ek
SFX I   ek   eién         ek
SFX I   ek   eiéig        ek
SFX I   ek   eiéhez       ek
SFX I   ek   eiébõl       ek
SFX I   ek   eiében       ek
SFX I   ek   eiébe        ek
SFX I   ek   eié          ek
SFX I   ek   eivé         ek
SFX I   ek   eivel        ek
SFX I   ek   eitõl        ek
SFX I   ek   eitekül      ek
SFX I   ek   eitekéül     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekéért    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekévé     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekével    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekétõl    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekét      ek
SFX I   ek   eitekérõl    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekért     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekére     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekénél    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekének    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekén      ek
SFX I   ek   eitekéig     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekéhez    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekébõl    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekében    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekébe     ek
SFX I   ek   eiteké       ek
SFX I   ek   eitektõl     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekrõl     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekre      ek
SFX I   ek   eiteknél     ek
SFX I   ek   eiteknek     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekként    ek
SFX I   ek   eitekké      ek
SFX I   ek   eitekkor     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekkel     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekig      ek
SFX I   ek   eitekhez     ek
SFX I   ek   eiteket      ek
SFX I   ek   eiteken      ek
SFX I   ek   eitekbõl     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekben     ek
SFX I   ek   eitekbe      ek
SFX I   ek   eitek        ek
SFX I   ek   eit          ek
SFX I   ek   eirõl        ek
SFX I   ek   eire         ek
SFX I   ek   einél        ek
SFX I   ek   einkül       ek
SFX I   ek   einkéül      ek
SFX I   ek   einkéért     ek
SFX I   ek   einkévé      ek
SFX I   ek   einkével     ek
SFX I   ek   einkétõl     ek
SFX I   ek   einkét       ek
SFX I   ek   einkérõl     ek
SFX I   ek   einkért      ek
SFX I   ek   einkére      ek
SFX I   ek   einkénél     ek
SFX I   ek   einkének     ek
SFX I   ek   einkén       ek
SFX I   ek   einkéig      ek
SFX I   ek   einkéhez     ek
SFX I   ek   einkébõl     ek
SFX I   ek   einkében     ek
SFX I   ek   einkébe      ek
SFX I   ek   einké        ek
SFX I   ek   einktõl      ek
SFX I   ek   einkrõl      ek
SFX I   ek   einkre       ek
SFX I   ek   einknél      ek
SFX I   ek   einknek      ek
SFX I   ek   einkként     ek
SFX I   ek   einkké       ek
SFX I   ek   einkkor      ek
SFX I   ek   einkkel      ek
SFX I   ek   einkig       ek
SFX I   ek   einkhez      ek
SFX I   ek   einket       ek
SFX I   ek   einken       ek
SFX I   ek   einkbõl      ek
SFX I   ek   einkben      ek
SFX I   ek   einkbe       ek
SFX I   ek   eink         ek
SFX I   ek   einek        ek
SFX I   ek   ein          ek
SFX I   ek   eimül        ek
SFX I   ek   eiméül       ek
SFX I   ek   eiméért      ek
SFX I   ek   eimévé       ek
SFX I   ek   eimével      ek
SFX I   ek   eimétõl      ek
SFX I   ek   eimét        ek
SFX I   ek   eimérõl      ek
SFX I   ek   eimért       ek
SFX I   ek   eimére       ek
SFX I   ek   eiménél      ek
SFX I   ek   eimének      ek
SFX I   ek   eimén        ek
SFX I   ek   eiméig       ek
SFX I   ek   eiméhez      ek
SFX I   ek   eimébõl      ek
SFX I   ek   eimében      ek
SFX I   ek   eimébe       ek
SFX I   ek   eimé         ek
SFX I   ek   eimtõl       ek
SFX I   ek   eimrõl       ek
SFX I   ek   eimre        ek
SFX I   ek   eimnél       ek
SFX I   ek   eimnek       ek
SFX I   ek   eimmé        ek
SFX I   ek   eimmel       ek
SFX I   ek   eimként      ek
SFX I   ek   eimkor       ek
