hu_HU.dic
üvegmázak/IY
üszkök/IJY
ügyfelek/IY
útitársak/IY
özönvizek/IY
örömtüzek/IY
önuralmak/IJY
önfegyelmek/IJY
ökrök/IJY
õrtüzek/IY
óramûvek/IY
ócskavasak/IY
íjak/IY
érzelmek/IJY
épületszárnyak/IY
életmûvek/IY
égtájak/IY
átkok/IJY
árvaházak/IY
ártalmak/IJY
árbockosarak/IY
álszakállak/IY
állványhidak/IY
állak/IY
ágyúcsövek/IY
zörgõfüvek/IY
zárótüzek/IY
zárak/IY
zsúpfedelek/IY
zsilipmedrek/IJY
vörösrezek/IY
vöcskök/IJY
vízsugarak/IY
vízimalmok/IJY
vízgyûjtõgödrök/IJY
vétkek/IJY
vérdíjak/IY
végbelek/IY
védõburkok/IJY
vásznak/IJY
vándorkövek/IY
vámházak/IY
vállak/IY
vágyálmok/IJY
vonzalmak/IJY
vizesárkok/IJY
vitorlakötelek/IY
visszerek/IY
virágférgek/IJY
világítótornyok/IJY
vidrakeserûfüvek/IY
vezetõrudak/IY
vesztek/XIJY
verslábak/IY
vermek/IJY
vendégházak/IY
vasmûvek/IY
vasak/IY
vakbelek/IY
vadszamarak/IY
utónevek/IY
uralkodóházak/IY
ujjak/IY
tüskebokrok/IJY
tüdõfüvek/IY
történelmek/IJY
tökbelek/IY
távcsõtükrök/IJY
tárgyalótermek/IJY
tánctermek/IJY
tálak/IY
tudásvágyak/IY
torkok/IJY
tollszárak/IY
tisztesfüvek/IY
tetõtornyok/IJY
terméskövek/IY
terelõutak/IY
tengerárak/IY
temetõbogarak/IY
tejutak/IY
tartóvázak/IY
tartásdíjak/IY
tanácsházak/IY
tantermek/IJY
taknyok/IJY
söröspoharak/IY
sérelmek/IJY
sárgarezek/IY
szövõmadarak/IY
szõlõcukrok/IJY
szívócsövek/IY
színterek/IY
színfalak/IY
szénalázak/IY
szélmalmok/IJY
székházak/IY
szárnyvonalak/IY
származékszavak/IY
számszeríjak/IY
szájkosarak/IY
szurkok/IJY
szolgalmak/IJY
sziromlevelek/IY
sziklahátak/IY
szerveroldalak/IY
szerelvényfalak/IY
szennyvizek/IY
szemérmek/IJY
szemhéjak/IY
szemetek/IY
szelepházak/IY
szegényházak/IY
szedrek/IJY
szarvasbogarak/IY
szamarak/IY
szakértelmek/IJY
szabadalomlevelek/IY
sulykok/IJY
sudarak/IY
sortüzek/IY
sodrok/IJY
simítótalpak/IY
seprõfüvek/IY
sejtelmek/IJY
savak/IY
sarkak/IJY
salátaolajak/IY
rózsaszirmok/IJY
rókafarkak/IJY
rémuralmak/IJY
ruhaujjak/IY
rudak/IY
rezek/IY
repceolajak/IY
reklámlevelek/IY
redõnyzárak/IY
rakodóterek/IY
pöcegödrök/IJY
pénztárak/IY
pántlikafüvek/IY
pálmaolajak/IY
puskacsövek/IY
postadíjak/IY
poklok/IJY
pockok/IJY
pirítógyökeret/IY
pihenõházak/IY
petefészkek/IJY
pelyhek/IJY
parlagfüvek/IY
padlófénymázak/IY
ostromzárak/IY
orrnyergek/IJY
orbáncfüvek/IY
oltalmak/IJY
oldalak/IY
odvak/IY
négyszázak/I
nyüvek/IY
nyílfüvek/IY
nyájak/IY
nyugalmak/IJY
nyolcezrek/Ia
nyilak/IY
nyelõcsövek/IY
nyakak/IY
nehezek/ID
nagyurak/IY
nagyhetek/IY
mûvajak/IY
mûlegyek/IY
mézek/IY
mérgek/IJY
mázak/IY
márványszobrok/IJY
mutatóujjak/IY
mozsarak/IY
mosogatóvizek/IY
mocsárlázak/IY
metszõfogak/IY
merítõkanalak/IY
menedékházak/IY
melegházak/IY
magánnyugdíjat/IY
madárkeserûfüvek/IY
lövészárkok/IJY
lóhátak/IY
légcsövek/IY
lábujjkörmök/IJY
lomtárak/IY
levek/IY
legyek/IY
középvonalak/IY
kövek/IY
körutak/IY
kölykök/IJY
kõhalmok/IJY
kéziszótárak/IY
képtárak/IY
kávéházak/IY
kutatótermek/IJY
krétavonalak/IY
kopásgödrök/IJY
kiutak/IY
kincsestárak/IY
kigyófüvek/IY
keresztvonalak/IY
kenyérkosarak/IY
kelyhek/IJY
kazánházak/IY
karhatalmak/IJY
kapcsok/IJY
kakukkszegfüvek/IY
játékterek/IY
juhnyájak/IY
javak/ID
ivókutak/IY
ingvállak/IY
ijedelmek/IJY
húslevek/IY
hímzõszálak/IY
házfalak/IY
háromszázak/I
hullámtörõgátak/IY
honvágyak/IY
hiedelmek/IJY
helységnévtárak/IY
határozószavak/IY
hasznok/IJY
hanyattegerek/IY
halottasházak/IY
hajóhidak/IY
hajfodrok/IJY
görvélyfüvek/IY
gépjármûvek/IY
gyümölcskenyerek/IY
gyõzelmek/IJY
gyorstárak/IY
gyertyalábak/IY
gurítókötelek/IY
füzek/IY
fûtõházak/IY
förtelmek/IJY
fõnevek/IY
fémrudak/IY
fájdalmak/IJY
forrasztócsövek/IY
folyómedrek/IJY
fogadótermek/IJY
festõfüvek/IY
felsõházak/IY
fegyházak/IY
farkak/IJY
ezüstlakodalmak/IJY
erõmûvek/IY
elõszavak/IY
ekeszarvak/IY
egerek/IY
dárdanyelek/IY
dombormûvek/IY
dezoxiribonukleinsavak/IY
darvak/IY
céklagyökerek/IY
csónakházak/IY
csizmaszárak/IY
cserebogarak/IY
csapfogak/IY
cinkostársak/IY
bûnvádak/IY
bútorraktárak/IY
bélfodrok/IJY
bábszínházak/IY
botránykövek/IY
borjak/IY
bodrok/IJY
bibeszájak/IY
beltartalmak/IJY
barátszegfüvek/IY
bakhátak/IY
aszúszegfüvek/IY
aranyak/IY
alsóházak/IY
alapkövek/IY
ajánlólevelek/IY
ablakszárnyak/IY
